Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.055

Budget message—Preliminary hearings.

In every code city a budget message prepared by or under the direction of the city's chief administrative officer shall be submitted as a part of the preliminary budget to the city's legislative body at least sixty days before the beginning of the city's next fiscal year and shall contain the following:

(1) An explanation of the budget document;

(2) An outline of the recommended financial policies and programs of the city for the ensuing fiscal year;

(3) A statement of the relation of the recommended appropriation to such policies and programs;

(4) A statement of the reason for salient changes from the previous year in appropriation and revenue items;

(5) An explanation for any recommended major changes in financial policy.

Prior to the final hearing on the budget, the legislative body or a committee thereof, shall schedule hearings on the budget or parts thereof, and may require the presence of department heads to give information regarding estimates and programs.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.055.]